pt-BR: Serviços > Serviços prestados às empresas > Serviços de escritório: Serviços de impressão e impressão personalizada
sv: Tjänster > Företagstjänster > Kontorstjänster: Utskrifts- och anpassade utskriftstjänster
th: บริการ > บริการทางธุรกิจ > บริการสำนักงาน: บริการงานพิมพ์และการพิมพ์ตามสั่ง
it: Servizi > Servizi commerciali > Servizi per uffici: Servizi di stampa e stampa personalizzata
hu: Szolgáltatások > Üzleti szolgáltatások > Irodai szolgáltatások: Nyomtatási és egyedi nyomtatási szolgáltatások
nl: Diensten > Bedrijfsdiensten > Kantoordiensten: Printen en aangepaste printservices
fr: Services > Services d’entreprise > Services de bureau: Services d’impression et d’impression personnalisée
ko: 서비스 > 기업 서비스 > 사무 업무 서비스: 인쇄 및 맞춤 인쇄 서비스
en: Services > Business Services > Office Services: Printing & Custom Print Services
zh-TW: 維修 > 商業服務 > 辦公室服務: 印刷及客製化列印服務
hr-HR: Usluge > Poslovne usluge > Uredske usluge: Usluge tiskanja i prilagođenog tiska
cs: Služby > Firemní služby > Služby pro kanceláře: Tiskové a zakázkové tiskové služby
da: Service > Virksomhedsservice > Kontortjenester: Trykning og tilpassede trykningstjenester
el: Υπηρεσίες > Υπηρεσίες επιχειρήσεων > Υπηρεσίες γραφείου: Υπηρεσίες εκτύπωσης & προσαρμοσμένης εκτύπωσης
pt-PT: Serviços > Serviços empresariais > Serviços para escritórios: Serviços de impressão e impressão personalizada
vi: Dịch vụ > Dịch vụ kinh doanh > Dịch vụ văn phòng: Dịch vụ in ấn và in tùy chỉnh
es: Servicios > Servicios empresariales > Servicios de oficina: Servicios de impresión e impresión personalizada
sk-SK: Servis > Obchodné služby > Kancelárske služby: Tlač a zákazkové tlačiarenské služby
ru: Услуги > Услуги для бизнеса > Обслуживание офисов: Печать и услуги индивидуальной печати
pl: Usługi > Business Services > Usługi biurowe: Drukowanie i usługi drukarskie na zamówienie
zh-CN: 服务 > 商业服务 > 办公服务: 打印与定制印刷服务
sl-SI: Storitve > Poslovne storitve > Pisarniške storitve: Tiskarske storitve in storitve personaliziranega tiska
fi: Huollot > Liikepalvelut > Toimistopalvelut: Tulostamisen ja mukautetun tulostamisen palvelut
tr: Servisler > İş Hizmetleri > Ofis Hizmetleri: Baskı ve Özel Baskı Hizmetleri
de: Dienstleistungen > Geschäftliche Dienstleistungen > Bürodienstleistungen: Druck- und individuelle Druckdienstleistungen
nb: Tjenester > Forretningstjenester > Kontortjenester: Trykk- og tilpassede trykktjenester
bg-BG: Услуги > Бизнес услуги > Офис услуги: Услуги за печат и персонализиран печат
ja: サービス > ビジネスサービス > オフィスサービス: 印刷・カスタム印刷サービス
ro-RO: Servicii > Servicii pentru afaceri > Servicii pentru birouri: Servicii de tipărire și imprimare personalizată
lt-LT: Paslaugos > Verslo paslaugos > Biuro paslaugos: Spausdinimo ir individualaus spausdinimo paslaugos